Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201460-2139
Rules and regulations.

The director may adopt and promulgate such
rules and regulations for the administration and enforcement of the Motorcycle
Safety Education Act as are necessary. In adopting such rules and regulations,
the director shall comply with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1981, LB 22, § 14;

R.S.1943, (1984), § 60-2119;

Laws 1986, LB 1004, § 21;

Laws 2011, LB170, § 14.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.